Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 6 Temporary Furloughs

45-7-110.
[Repealed] Criteria for order; notice; applicability; effect of other laws; effect on retirement or pension system; repealer.

History.

Ga. L. 1991, Ex. Sess., p. 87, § 1, and Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 45; repealed by Ga. L. 1991, Ex. Sess., p. 87, § 1, effective March 31, 1993.